test/src/morphology/V-kundams_gt-norm.yaml
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундындерявлимик
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундындерявлимим
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+TV+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундындерявлимизь
